Utah statutes.
17-42-105.   Failure to comply with sterilization agreement.
If a recipient fails to comply with the sterilization agreement under
Subsection 17-42-103(2):
(1)  the failure is ground for seizure and impoundment of the animal by the
animal shelter from whom the recipient obtained the animal;
(2)  the recipient relinquishes all ownership rights regarding the animal and
any claim to expenses incurred in maintenance and care of the animal; and
(3)  the recipient forfeits the sterilization deposit.
